Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.100

Programs—Planning—Consultation with public and private entities—Cooperation.

(1) The governing body, in planning and devising the advanced college tuition payment program and the Washington college savings program, shall consult with the investment board, the state treasurer, the office of financial management, and the institutions of higher education.

(2) The governing body may seek the assistance of the state agencies named in subsection (1) of this section, private financial institutions, and any other qualified party with experience in the areas of accounting, actuary, risk management, or investment management to assist with preparing an accounting of the programs and ensuring the fiscal soundness of the advanced college tuition payment program account and the Washington college savings program account.

(3) State agencies and public institutions of higher education shall fully cooperate with the governing body in matters relating to the programs in order to ensure the solvency of the advanced college tuition payment [program] account and the Washington college savings program account and ability of the governing body to meet outstanding commitments.

[ 2016 c 69 s 14; 2000 c 14 s 7; 1997 c 289 s 10.]